Tennessee, session 114, SB0727.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 35-5-114(d), is amended by deleting
"ten (10) business days prior" and substituting "twelve (12) business days prior".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0727
002675
- 1 -